Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-3436
Confidentiality requirements; violation; penalty.

A person who intentionally or knowingly violates the confidentiality requirements of the Overdose Fatality Review Teams Act is guilty of a Class II misdemeanor.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 93.